California statutes. Probate Code
-------------------------------------------

18005.

The question of liability as between the trust estate and the trustee personally may be determined in a proceeding under Section 17200.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Protection of Third Persons [18100. - 18108.]

18100.

With respect to a third person dealing with a trustee or assisting a trustee in the conduct of a transaction, if the third person acts in good faith and for a valuable consideration and without actual knowledge that the trustee is exceeding the trustee’s powers or improperly exercising them:

(a) The third person is not bound to inquire whether the trustee has power to act or is properly exercising a power and may assume without inquiry the existence of a trust power and its proper exercise.

(b) The third person is fully protected in dealing with or assisting the trustee just as if the trustee has and is properly exercising the power the trustee purports to exercise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18100.5.

(a) The trustee may present a certification of trust to any person in lieu of providing a copy of the trust instrument to establish the existence or terms of the trust. A certification of trust may be executed by the trustee voluntarily or at the request of the person with whom the trustee is dealing.

(b) The certification of trust may confirm the following facts or contain the following information:

(1) The existence of the trust and date of execution of the trust instrument.

(2) The identity of the settlor or settlors and the currently acting trustee or trustees of the trust.

(3) The powers of the trustee.

(4) The revocability or irrevocability of the trust and the identity of any person holding any power to revoke the trust.

(5) When there are multiple trustees, the signature authority of the trustees, indicating whether all, or less than all, of the currently acting trustees are required to sign in order to exercise various powers of the trustee.

(6) The trust identification number, whether a social security number or an employer identification number.

(7) The manner in which title to trust assets should be taken.

(8) The legal description of any interest in real property held in the trust.

(c) The certification shall contain a statement that the trust has not been revoked, modified, or amended in any manner which would cause the representations contained in the certification of trust to be incorrect and shall contain a statement that it is being signed by all of the currently acting trustees of the trust. The certification shall be in the form of an acknowledged declaration signed by all currently acting trustees of the trust. The certification signed by the currently acting trustee may be recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county where all or a portion of the real property is located.

(d) The certification of trust may, but is not required to, include excerpts from the original trust documents, any amendments thereto, and any other documents evidencing or pertaining to the succession of successor trustees. The certification of trust shall not be required to contain the dispositive provisions of the trust which set forth the distribution of the trust estate.

(e) A person whose interest is, or may be, affected by the certification of trust may require that the trustee offering or recording the certification of trust provide copies of those excerpts from the original trust documents, any amendments thereto, and any other documents which designate, evidence, or pertain to the succession of the trustee or confer upon the trustee the power to act in the pending transaction, or both. Nothing in this section is intended to require or imply an obligation to provide the dispositive provisions of the trust or the entire trust and amendments thereto.

(f) A person who acts in reliance upon a certification of trust without actual knowledge that the representations contained therein are incorrect is not liable to any person for so acting. A person who does not have actual knowledge that the facts contained in the certification of trust are incorrect may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the certification of trust. Actual knowledge shall not be inferred solely from the fact that a copy of all or part of the trust instrument is held by the person relying upon the trust certification. Any transaction, and any lien created thereby, entered into by the trustee and a person acting in reliance upon a certification of trust shall be enforceable against the trust assets. However, if the person has actual knowledge that the trustee is acting outside the scope of the trust, then the transaction is not enforceable against the trust assets. Nothing contained herein shall limit the rights of the beneficiaries of the trust against the trustee.

(g) A person’s failure to demand a certification of trust does not affect the protection provided that person by Section 18100, and no inference as to whether that person has acted in good faith may be drawn from the failure to demand a certification of trust. Nothing in this section is intended to create an implication that a person is liable for acting in reliance upon a certification of trust under circumstances where the requirements of this section are not satisfied.

(h) Except when requested by a beneficiary or in the context of litigation concerning a trust and subject to the provisions of subdivision (e), any person making a demand for the trust documents in addition to a certification of trust to prove facts set forth in the certification of trust acceptable to the third party shall be liable for damages, including attorney’s fees, incurred as a result of the refusal to accept the certification of trust in lieu of the requested documents if the court determines that the person acted in bad faith in requesting the trust documents.

(i) Any person may record a certification of trust that relates to an interest in real property in the office of the county recorder in any county in which all or a portion of the real property is located. The county recorder shall impose any fee prescribed by law for recording that document sufficient to cover all costs incurred by the county in recording the document. The recorded certification of trust shall be a public record of the real property involved. This subdivision does not create a requirement to record a certification of trust in conjunction with the recordation of a transfer of title of real property involving a trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 136, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18101.

A third person who acts in good faith is not bound to ensure the proper application of trust property paid or delivered to the trustee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18102.

If a third person acting in good faith and for a valuable consideration enters into a transaction with a former trustee without knowledge that the person is no longer a trustee, the third person is fully protected just as if the former trustee were still a trustee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18103.

If an express trust relating to real property is not contained or declared in the grant to the trustee, or in an instrument signed by the trustee and recorded in the same office with the grant to the trustee, the grant shall be deemed absolute in favor of a person dealing with the trustee in good faith and for a valuable consideration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18104.

(a) If an interest in or lien or encumbrance on real property is conveyed, created, or affected by an instrument in favor of a person in trust but no beneficiary is indicated in the instrument, it is presumed that the person holds the interest, lien, or encumbrance absolutely and free of the trust. This is a presumption affecting the burden of proof. In an action or proceeding involving the interest, lien, or encumbrance instituted against the person, the person shall be deemed the only necessary representative of the undisclosed beneficiary and of the original grantor or settlor and anyone claiming under them. A judgment is binding upon and conclusive against these persons as to all matters finally adjudicated in the judgment.

(b) An instrument executed by the person holding an interest, lien, or encumbrance described in subdivision (a), whether purporting to be the act of that person in his or her own right or in the capacity of a trustee, is presumed to affect the interest, lien, or encumbrance according to the tenor of the instrument. This is a presumption affecting the burden of proof. Upon the recording of the instrument in the county where the land affected by the instrument is located, the presumption is conclusive in favor of a person acting in good faith and for valuable consideration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18105.

If title to an interest in real property is affected by a change of trustee, the successor trustee may execute and record in the county in which the property is located an affidavit of change of trustee. The county recorder shall impose any fee prescribed by law for recording that document in an amount sufficient to cover all costs incurred by the county in recording the document. The affidavit shall include the legal description of the real property, the name of the former trustee or trustees and the name of the successor trustee or trustees. The affidavit may also, but is not required to, include excerpts from the original trust documents, any amendments thereto, and any other documents evidencing or pertaining to the succession of the successor trustee or trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18106.

(a) A document establishing the fact of change of trustee recorded pursuant to this chapter is subject to all statutory requirements for recorded documents.

(b) The county recorder shall index a document establishing the fact of change of a trustee recorded pursuant to this section in the index of grantors and grantees. The index entry shall be for the grantor, and for the purpose of this index, the person who has been succeeded as trustee shall be deemed to be the grantor. The county recorder shall impose any fee prescribed by law for indexing that document in an amount sufficient to cover all costs incurred by the county in indexing the document.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 136, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18107.

A document establishing the change of a trustee recorded pursuant to this chapter is prima facie evidence of the change of trustee insofar as the document identifies an interest in real property located in the county, title to which is affected by the change of trustee. The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 136, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18108.

Any person whose interest is, or may be, affected by the recordation of an affidavit of change of trustee pursuant to this chapter may require that the successor trustee provide copies of those excerpts from the original trust documents, any amendments thereto, and any other documents which evidence or pertain to the succession of the successor trustee or trustees. Nothing in this section is intended to require or imply an obligation to provide the dispositive provisions of the trust or the entire trust and any amendments thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 136, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Rights of Creditors of Settlor [18200. - 18201.]

18200.

If the settlor retains the power to revoke the trust in whole or in part, the trust property is subject to the claims of creditors of the settlor to the extent of the power of revocation during the lifetime of the settlor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18201.

Any settlor whose trust property is subject to the claims of creditors pursuant to Section 18200 shall be entitled to all exemptions as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 682, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. UNIFORM PRUDENT MANAGEMENT OF INSTITUTIONAL FUNDS ACT [18501. - 18510.]

18501.

This part may be cited as the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18502.

As used in this part, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, the promotion of a governmental purpose, or any other purpose the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

(b) “Endowment fund” means an institutional fund or part thereof that, under the terms of a gift instrument, is not wholly expendable by the institution on a current basis. The term does not include assets that an institution designates as an endowment fund for its own use.

(c) “Gift instrument” means a record or records, including an institutional solicitation, under which property is granted to, transferred to, or held by an institution as an institutional fund.

(d) “Institution” means any of the following:

(1) A person, other than an individual, organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes.

(2) A government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, to the extent that it holds funds exclusively for a charitable purpose.

(3) A trust that had both charitable and noncharitable interests, after all noncharitable interests have terminated.

(e) “Institutional fund” means a fund held by an institution exclusively for charitable purposes. The term does not include any of the following:

(1) Program-related assets.

(2) A fund held for an institution by a trustee that is not an institution.

(3) A fund in which a beneficiary that is not an institution has an interest, other than an interest that could arise upon violation or failure of the purposes of the fund.

(f) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(g) “Program-related asset” means an asset held by an institution primarily to accomplish a charitable purpose of the institution and not primarily for investment.

(h) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18503.

(a) Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in a gift instrument, an institution, in managing and investing an institutional fund, shall consider the charitable purposes of the institution and the purposes of the institutional fund.

(b) In addition to complying with the duty of loyalty imposed by law other than this part, each person responsible for managing and investing an institutional fund shall manage and invest the fund in good faith and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

(c) In managing and investing an institutional fund, an institution is subject to both of the following:

(1) It may incur only costs that are appropriate and reasonable in relation to the assets, the purposes of the institution, and the skills available to the institution.

(2) It shall make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the management and investment of the fund.

(d) An institution may pool two or more institutional funds for purposes of management and investment.

(e) Except as otherwise provided by a gift instrument, the following rules apply:

(1) In managing and investing an institutional fund, all of the following factors, if relevant, must be considered:

(A) General economic conditions.

(B) The possible effect of inflation or deflation.

(C) The expected tax consequences, if any, of investment decisions or strategies.

(D) The role that each investment or course of action plays within the overall investment portfolio of the fund.

(E) The expected total return from income and the appreciation of investments.

(F) Other resources of the institution.

(G) The needs of the institution and the fund to make distributions and to preserve capital.

(H) An asset’s special relationship or special value, if any, to the charitable purposes of the institution.

(2) Management and investment decisions about an individual asset must be made not in isolation but rather in the context of the institutional fund’s portfolio of investments as a whole and as a part of an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the fund and to the institution.

(3) Except as otherwise provided by law other than this part, an institution may invest in any kind of property or type of investment consistent with this section.

(4) An institution shall diversify the investments of an institutional fund unless the institution reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the fund are better served without diversification.

(5) Within a reasonable time after receiving property, an institution shall make and carry out decisions concerning the retention or disposition of the property or to rebalance a portfolio, in order to bring the institutional fund into compliance with the purposes, terms, and distribution requirements of the institution as necessary to meet other circumstances of the institution and the requirements of this part.

(6) A person that has special skills or expertise, or is selected in reliance upon the person’s representation that the person has special skills or expertise, has a duty to use those skills or that expertise in managing and investing institutional funds.

(f) Nothing in this section alters the duties and liabilities of a director of a nonprofit public benefit corporation under Section 5240 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18504.

(a) Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in the gift instrument, an institution may appropriate for expenditure or accumulate so much of an endowment fund as the institution determines is prudent for the uses, benefits, purposes, and duration for which the endowment fund is established. Unless stated otherwise in the gift instrument, the assets in an endowment fund are donor-restricted assets until appropriated for expenditure by the institution. In making a determination to appropriate or accumulate, the institution shall act in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, and shall consider, if relevant, all of the following factors:

(1) The duration and preservation of the endowment fund.

(2) The purposes of the institution and the endowment fund.

(3) General economic conditions.

(4) The possible effect of inflation or deflation.

(5) The expected total return from income and the appreciation of investments.

(6) Other resources of the institution.

(7) The investment policy of the institution.

(b) To limit the authority to appropriate for expenditure or accumulate under subdivision (a), a gift instrument must specifically state the limitation.

(c) Terms in a gift instrument designating a gift as an endowment, or a direction or authorization in the gift instrument to use only “income,” “interest,” “dividends,” or “rents, issues, or profits,” or “to preserve the principal intact,” or words of similar import have both of the following effects:

(1) To create an endowment fund of permanent duration unless other language in the gift instrument limits the duration or purpose of the fund.

(2) To not otherwise limit the authority to appropriate for expenditure or accumulate under subdivision (a).

(d) The appropriation for expenditure in any year of an amount greater than 7 percent of the fair market value of an endowment fund, calculated on the basis of market values determined at least quarterly and averaged over a period of not less than three years immediately preceding the year in which the appropriation for expenditure is made, creates a rebuttable presumption of imprudence. For an endowment fund in existence for fewer than three years, the fair market value of the endowment fund shall be calculated for the period the endowment fund has been in existence. This subdivision does not do any of the following:

(1) Apply to an appropriation for expenditure permitted under law other than this part or by the gift instrument.

(2) Apply to a private or public postsecondary educational institution, or to a campus foundation established by and operated under the auspices of such an educational institution.

(3) Create a presumption of prudence for an appropriation for expenditure of an amount less than or equal to 7 percent of the fair market value of the endowment fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18505.

(a) Subject to any specific limitation set forth in a gift instrument or in law other than this part, an institution may delegate to an external agent the management and investment of an institutional fund to the extent that an institution could prudently delegate under the circumstances. An institution shall act in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, in all of the following:

(1) Selecting an agent.

(2) Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes of the institution and the institutional fund.

(3) Periodically reviewing the agent’s actions in order to monitor the agent’s performance and compliance with the scope and terms of the delegation.

(b) In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the institution to exercise reasonable care to comply with the scope and terms of the delegation.

(c) An institution that complies with subdivision (a) is not liable for the decisions or actions of an agent to which the function was delegated except to the extent a trustee would be liable for those actions or decisions under Sections 16052 and 16401.

(d) By accepting delegation of a management or investment function from an institution that is subject to the laws of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in all proceedings arising from or related to the delegation or the performance of the delegated function.

(e) An institution may delegate management and investment functions to its committees, officers, or employees as authorized by law of this state other than this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18506.

(a) If the donor consents in a record, an institution may release or modify, in whole or in part, a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund. A release or modification may not allow a fund to be used for a purpose other than a charitable purpose of the institution.

(b) The court, upon application of an institution, may modify a restriction contained in a gift instrument regarding the management or investment of an institutional fund if the restriction has become impracticable or wasteful, if it impairs the management or investment of the fund, or if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the donor, a modification of a restriction will further the purposes of the fund. The institution shall notify the Attorney General of the application, and the Attorney General must be given an opportunity to be heard. To the extent practicable, any modification must be made in accordance with the donor’s probable intention.

(c) If a particular charitable purpose or a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the use of an institutional fund becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the court, upon application of an institution, may modify the purpose of the fund or the restriction on the use of the fund in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift instrument. The institution shall notify the Attorney General of the application, and the Attorney General must be given an opportunity to be heard.

(d) If an institution determines that a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund is unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the institution, 60 days after notification to the Attorney General and to the donor at the donor’s last known address in the records of the institution, may release or modify the restriction, in whole or part, if all of the following apply:

(1) The institutional fund subject to the restriction has a total value of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(2) More than 20 years have elapsed since the fund was established.

(3) The institution uses the property in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift instrument. An institution that releases or modifies a restriction under this subdivision may, if appropriate circumstances arise thereafter, use the property in accordance with the restriction notwithstanding its release or modification, and that use is deemed to satisfy the consistency requirement of this paragraph.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18507.

Compliance with this part is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time a decision is made or action is taken, and not by hindsight.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18508.

This part applies to institutional funds existing on or established after January 1, 2009. As applied to institutional funds existing on January 1, 2009, this part governs only decisions made or actions taken on or after that date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18509.

This part modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101 of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(a)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103 of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18510.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. PAYMENT OF CLAIMS, DEBTS, AND EXPENSES FROM REVOCABLE TRUST OF DECEASED SETTLOR [19000. - 19403.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [19000. - 19012.]

19000.

As used in this part:

(a) “Claim” means a demand for payment for any of the following, whether due, not due, accrued or not accrued, or contingent, and whether liquidated or unliquidated:

(1) Liability of the deceased settlor, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise.

(2) Liability for taxes incurred before the deceased settlor’s death, whether assessed before or after the deceased settlor’s death, other than property taxes and assessments secured by real property liens.

(3) Liability for the funeral expenses of the deceased settlor.

(b) “Claim” does not include a dispute regarding title to specific property alleged to be included in the trust estate.

(c) “Creditor” means a person who may have a claim against the trust property.

(d) “Trust” means a trust described in Section 18200, or, if a portion of a trust, that portion that remained subject to the power of revocation at the deceased settlor’s death.

(e) “Deceased settlor” means a deceased person who, at the time of his or her death, held the power to revoke the trust in whole or in part.

(f) “Debts” means all
 claims, as defined in subdivision (a), all expenses of administration, and all other proper charges against the trust estate, including taxes.

(g) “Probate estate” means a decedent’s estate subject to administration pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 7000).

(h) “Trust estate” means a decedent’s property, real and personal, that
 is titled in the name of the trustee of the deceased settlor’s trust or confirmed by order of the court to the trustee of the deceased settlor’s trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 48, Sec. 1.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19001.

(a) Upon the death of a settlor, the property of the deceased settlor that was subject to the power of revocation at the time of the settlor’s death is subject to the claims of creditors of the deceased settlor’s probate estate and to the expenses of administration of the probate estate to the extent that the deceased settlor’s probate estate is inadequate to satisfy those claims and expenses.

(b) The
 deceased settlor, by appropriate direction in the trust instrument, may direct the priority of sources of payment of debts among subtrusts or other gifts established by the trust at the deceased settlor’s death. Notwithstanding this subdivision, no direction by the settlor shall alter the priority of payment, from whatever source, of the matters set forth in Section 11420 which shall be applied to the trust as it applies to a probate estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19002.

(a) Except as expressly provided, this part shall not be construed to affect the right of any creditor to recover from any revocable trust established by the deceased settlor. 

(b) Nothing in this part shall be construed as a construction or alteration of any claims procedure set forth under Part 4 (commencing with Section 9000) of Division 7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19003.

(a) At any time following the death of the settlor, and during the time that there has been no filing of a petition to administer the probate estate of the deceased settlor in this state of which the trustee has actual knowledge, the trustee may file with the court a proposed notice to creditors. Upon the court’s assignment of a proceeding number to the proposed notice, the trustee shall publish and serve notice to creditors of the deceased settlor in the form and within the time prescribed in Chapters 3 (commencing with Section 19040) and 4 (commencing with Section 19050). That action shall constitute notice to creditors of the requirements of this part.

(b) The filing shall be made with the superior court for the county in this state where the deceased settlor resided at the time of death, or if none, in any county in this state in which trust property was located at the time of the settlor’s death, or if none, in the county in this state that was the principal place of administration of the trust at the time of the settlor’s death.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) affects a notice or request to a public entity required by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 19200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 48, Sec. 3.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19004.

If the trustee files, publishes, and serves notice as set forth in Section 19003, then:

(a) All claims against the trust shall be filed in the manner and within the time provided in this part. 

(b) A claim that is not filed as provided in this part is barred from collection from trust assets. 

(c) The holder of a claim may not maintain an action on the claim against the trust unless the claim is first filed as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19005.

The trustee may at any time pay, reject, or contest any claim against the deceased settlor or settle any claim by compromise, arbitration, or otherwise. The trustee may also file a petition in the manner set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 19020) to settle any claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19006.

(a) If a trustee of a trust established by the deceased settlor files, publishes, and serves notice as provided in Section 19003 the protection from creditors afforded that trustee and trust shall also be afforded to any other trusts established by the deceased settlor and the trustees and beneficiaries of those trusts.

(b) If the personal representative of the deceased settlor’s probate estate has published notice under Section 8120 and given notice of administration of the probate estate of the deceased
 settlor under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9050) of Part 4 of Division 7, the protection from creditors afforded the personal representative of the deceased settlor’s probate estate shall be afforded to the trustee and to the beneficiaries of the trust.

(c) In the event that, following the filing and publication of the notice set forth in Section 19003, there shall be commenced any proceeding under which a notice pursuant to Section 8120 is required to be published, then the trustee shall have a right of collection against that probate estate to recover the amount of any debts paid from trust assets that would otherwise have been satisfied (whether by law or by direction in the deceased settlor’s will or trust) by the property
 subject to probate proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 48, Sec. 4.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19007.

Nothing in this part shall determine the liability of any trust established by the deceased settlor as against any other trust established by that settlor, except to the extent that the trustee of the other trust shall file, publish, and serve the notice specified in Section 19003 and thereafter seek a determination of relative liability pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 19020).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19008.

If there is no proceeding to administer the probate estate of the deceased settlor, and if the trustee does not file a proposed notice to creditors pursuant to Section 19003 and does not publish notice to creditors pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19040), then the liability of the trust to any creditor of the deceased settlor shall be as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 48, Sec. 5.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19009.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to permit or require disclosure of the existence of the trust or the contents of any of its provisions to any creditor or beneficiary except as that creditor or beneficiary may otherwise be entitled to that information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19010.

Nothing in this part imposes any duty on the trustee to initiate the notice proceeding set forth in Section 19003, and the trustee is not liable for failure to initiate the proceeding under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19011.

(a) The Judicial Council may prescribe the form and contents of the petition, notice, claim form, and allowance or rejection form to be used pursuant to this part. The allowance or rejection form may be part of the claim form.

(b) Any claim form adopted by the Judicial Council shall inform the creditor that the claim must be filed with the court and a copy delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the trustee. The claim form shall include a proof of delivery of a copy of the claim to the trustee, which may be completed by the claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 99.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19012.

(a) This part applies to claims against any deceased settlor who dies on or after January 1, 1992. 

(b) The applicable law in effect before January 1, 1992, continues to apply to claims against any deceased settlor who dies before January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Petition for Approval and Settlement of Claims Against Deceased Settlor [19020. - 19030.]

19020.

At any time after the filing and first publication of notice pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19040), and after expiration of the time to file claims provided in that chapter, a trustee or beneficiary may petition the court under this chapter to approve either of the following:

(a) Allowance, compromise, or settlement of any claims that have not been rejected by the trustee under the procedure provided in this part and for which trust property may be liable. 

(b) An allocation of any amounts due by reason of an action described in subdivision (a) to two or more trusts which may be liable for the claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19021.

The petition shall be filed in that county as may be determined pursuant to Section 19003. In the event this action seeks approval of allocation to two or more trusts for which the notice proceeding in Section 19003 would prescribe superior courts for more than one county, the court located in the county so prescribed for the trustee initiating the proceeding under this chapter shall have jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19022.

(a) A proceeding under this chapter is commenced by filing a verified petition stating facts showing that the petition is authorized under this chapter and the grounds of the petition.
